src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Sublexica for Verb

Table of content:

* The auxiliaries
- Negation verb
- Copula
- Modals
* Main verbs
- Even syllable stems
- Intransitives
- Transitives
- Odd syllable stems
- Intranstives
- Transitives
- Contracted stems
- Intransitives
- Transitives
- Assimilated loan verbs
- Intransitives
- Transitives
- Main inflectional categories
- suffix lexicas
- Verb derivation

IV means intransitive verbs, TV means transitive verbs.

# Auxiliary verbs

## Negation verb 

LEXICON NEG 

## Copula

LEXICON ÅRROT 

LEXICON LIEHKET 

LEXICON LULU 

## Modals

LEXICON GALGGAT_IV  even-syllable modal verbs.

* soajttet # Eveb-syllable test examples:*
* *soajtáv:* `soajttet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *soajttiv:* `soajttet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *såjtijma:* `soajttet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON VIERTTIT_IV  Contracted modal verbs.

* hæhttut # Eveb-syllable test examples:*
* *hæhttut:* `hæhttut+V+IV+Inf`
* *hähttut:* `hæhttut+V+IV+Inf`
* *hæhttuv:* `hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *hähttuv:* `hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *hæhttujma:* `hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`
* *hähttujma:* `hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

# Ordinary main verbs

## Even-syllable stems
Intransitives

LEXICON GALSSJOT_IV  Impersonal o-verbs

* hærmmot # Eveb-syllable test examples:*
* *hærmmu:* `hærmmot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3`
* *härmmu:* `hærmmot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3`
* *hærmoj:* `hærmmot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3`
* *härmoj:* `hærmmot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3`

LEXICON BÅRSSJOT_IV  o-verbs with

* hæssot # Eveb-syllable test examples:*
* *hæsov:* `hæssot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *häsov:* `hæssot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *hessuv:* `hæssot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *hæsojma:* `hæssot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`
* *häsojma:* `hæssot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON VILSSJOT_IV  o-verbs as BÅRSSJOT but without derivations -stit, -stallat, -stahttet, - stasstet.  With dim -astit that are hardcoded

* libjjot # Eveb-syllable test examples:*
* *libjov:* `libjjot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *libjjuv:* `libjjot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *libjojma:* `libjjot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON BUOLLET_IV   e-verbs

* liddet # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *littáv:* `liddet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *liddiv:* `liddet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *littijma:* `liddet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON BOAHTET_IV  e-verbs like BUOLLET_IV without passive

* boahtet # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *boadáv:* `boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *båhtiv:* `boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *bådijma:* `boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON VIEDJET_IV   e-verbs GRADE II-I WITH IE DIPHT.

* biehket # Eveb-syllable test examples:*
* *bægáv:* `biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *bägáv:* `biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *biehkiv:* `biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *biegijma:* `biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON ASSTAT_IV   only for asstat, no passive

* asstat # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *astav:* `asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *asstiv:* `asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *astajma:* `asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON RAVGGAT_IV   a- and å-verbs only Sg3 passive.

* bajássjaddat # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *biváv* `bivvat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *bivviv* `bivvat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *bivájma:* `bivvat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON BIEGGAT_IV  Impersonals

* dednjat # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *dædnjá:* `dednjat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3`
* *dädnjá:* `dednjat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3`
* *denjaj:* `dednjat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3`

LEXICON RAVGGALASSTET_IV    Like RAVGGAT for already derived words (except words ending -uššat) - no actio as first part of compounds, but reintroduced

* dehpudallat # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *dehpudaláv:* `dehpudallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *dehpudalliv:* `dehpudallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *dehpudalájma:* `dehpudallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON BIEKKASTALLAT_IV  Already derived impersonals

* dehpudallat # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *duhpárasstá:* `duhpárasstet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3`
* *duhpárastij:* `duhpárasstet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3`

LEXICON GUOTTEDALLAT_IV    passives on -allat - no actio as first part of compounds, but reintroduced

* duolmudallat # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *duolmudaláv:* `duolmudallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *duolmudalliv:* `duolmudallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *duolmudalájma:* `duolmudallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON HIEBADUVVAT_IV   passives on -uvvat - no actio as first part of compounds, but reintroduced

* duostoduvvat # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *duostoduváv:* `duostoduvvat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *duostoduvviv:* `duostoduvvat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *duostoduvájma:* `duostoduvvat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

Transitives
LEXICON MÁHTTET_TV    verbs without personal passive

* jáhkket # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *jáhkáv:* `jáhkket+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *jáhkkiv:* `jáhkket+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *jáhkijma:* `jáhkket+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON BASSAT_TV   a- and å-verbs. Three passives

* jåksåt # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *jåvsåv:* `jåksåt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *jåksiv:* `jåksåt+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *jåvsåjma:* `jåksåt+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON BASSALASSTET_TV   Like BASSAT for already derived words (except words ending -uššat) - no actio as first part of compounds, but reintroduced. Three passives

* jårgudallat # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *jårgudaláv:* `jårgudallat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *jårgudalliv:* `jårgudallat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *jårgudalájma:* `jårgudallat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON HIEJTEDAHTTET_TV   Like BASSALASSTET_TV, but for words ending on -ahttet. Diffrence is Use/NG an Use/-Spell for NomAg "hiejedahttijn", since this is rearly used an is mixed up with gerundium "hiejtedattijn". Like BASSAT for already derived words (except words ending -uššat) - no actio as first part of compounds, but reintroduced. Three passives

* jårgudallat # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *jårgudaláv:* `jårgudallat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *jårgudalliv:* `jårgudallat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *jårgudalájma:* `jårgudallat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON JUHKAT_TV   a-verbs like BASSAT_TV but but without derivations -stit, -stallat, -stahttet, - stasstet. Dim -istit that are hardcoded. Three passives

* njammat # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *njamáv:* `njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *njammiv:* `njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *njamájma:* `njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON LÁHPPET_TV   e-verbs. Three passives

* oajttet # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *oajtáv:* `oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *oajttiv:* `oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *åjtijma:* `oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON JIEHKET_TV   e-verbs GRADE II-I WITH IE DIPHT. Three passives

* sievvet # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *sæváv:* `sievvet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *säváv:* `sievvet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *sievviv:* `sievvet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *sievijma:* `sievvet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON DIEHTET_TV   Only this one word, unusual diphtong behavior. No passive

* diehtet # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *diedáv:* `diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *diehtiv:* `diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *diedijma:* `diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON GÁDJOT_TV  o-verbs. only duvvat passive.

* sjpædtjot # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *sjpættjov:* `sjpædtjot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *sjpättjov:* `sjpædtjot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *sjpædtjuv:* `sjpædtjot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *sjpädtjuv:* `sjpædtjot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *sjpættjojma:* `sjpædtjot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`
* *sjpättjojma:* `sjpædtjot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON JÅRGGOT_TV  o-verbs with dim -astit that are hardcoded.  Duvvat and dallat passive.

* boarkkot # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *boarkov:* `boarkkot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *boarkkuv:* `boarkkot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *boarkojma:* `boarkkot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

## Odd-syllable stems

This is just awaiting a manual classification

intransitives

LEXICON BIEKKASTIT_IV  Impersonals, only Sg3

LEXICON JÅRGESTIT_IV  ONLY FOR -STIT verbs, makes Err/Orth jårgest, an with other verbs in this lexicon they will get err/orth Prs Sg3 even if it's same as corrct prs sg3

* doalvestit # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *doalvestav:* `doalvestit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *doalvestiv:* `doalvestit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *doalvestijma:* `doalvestit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON MÅRIJDIT_IV   ONLY FOR Words ending -IJDIT. Same as BEGATJIT, but a common error is to write "jårgidit", so the whole -ijdit and Err/Orth -idit is made in this  lexicon

LEXICON BEGATJIT_IV   Words ending -tjit, -jdit, reciprocals on -dit, momentatives on -dit, -edit, continuatives on -ldit, -nit, essives on -hit and 5-syllables - no actio cmps, but  only Sg3 passivereintroduced

* duojkkuhit # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *duojkkuhav:* `duojkkuhit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *duojkkuhiv:* `duojkkuhit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *duojkkuhijma:* `duojkkuhit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON VÁNDARDIT_IV At the moment IV

* doalvestit # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *vándardav:* `vándardit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *vándardiv:* `vándardit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *vándardijma:* `vándardit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON BALÁDIT_IV   continuatives on -dit, frequentatives on -odit, reciprocals, momentatives and frequentatives ending -alit - actio cpms, only Sg3 passive

* lihtudit # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *lihtudav:* `lihtudit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *lihtudiv:* `lihtudit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *lihtudijma:* `lihtudit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON SUOGNALIT_IV  Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit.  only Sg3 passive

* loavkkalit # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *loavkkalav:* `loavkkalit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *loavkkaliv:* `loavkkalit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *loavkkalijma:* `loavkkalit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON LASSÁNIT_IV  verbs ending -nit, -sit, no passive

* rievddánit # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *rievddánav:* `rievddánit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *rievddániv:* `rievddánit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *rievddánijma:* `rievddánit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON BÁHTARIT_IV verbs ending -rit.  only Sg3 passive

* sjtávttjurit # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *sjtávttjurav:* `sjtávttjurit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *sjtávttjuriv:* `sjtávttjurit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *sjtávttjurijma:* `sjtávttjurit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

transitives

LEXICON FÁRMASTIT_TV   ONLY FOR verbs ending on -stit. makes Err/Orth jårgest, an with other verbs in this lexicon they will get err/orth Prs Sg3 even if it's same as corrct prs sg3. All -uvvat passives.

LEXICON HÁLIJDIT_TV   ONLY FOR Words ending -IJDIT. Same as MUJTATJIT, but a common error is to write "hálidit", so the whole -ijdit and Err/Orth -idit is made in this  lexicon

LEXICON UNNEDIT_TV   All -uvvat passives.

* nuoledit # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *nuoledav:* `nuoledit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *nuolediv:* `nuoledit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *nuoledijma:* `nuoledit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON MUJTATJIT_TV   Words ending -tjit, -jdit, reciprocals on -dit, momentatives on -dit, -edit, continuatives on -ldit, -nit, essives on -hit and 5-syllables - no actio cmps, but reintroduced. All -uvvat passives

* nårddådit # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *nårddådav:* `nårddådit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *nårddådiv:* `nårddådit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *nårddådijma:* `nårddådit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON BÅNJÅDIT_TV   continuatives on -dit, frequentatives on -odit, reciprocals, momentatives and frequentatives ending -alit - actio cpms. All -uvvat  passives.

* tsirggalit # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *tsirggalav:* `tsirggalit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *tsirggaliv:* `tsirggalit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *tsirggalijma:* `tsirggalit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON VUORDDELIT_TV  Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit. All -uvvat passives

* tsåggålit # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *tsåggålav:* `tsåggålit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *tsåggåliv:* `tsåggålit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *tsåggålijma:* `tsåggålit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

## Contracted stems

LEXICON SJIERRIT_IV  Impersonals

* boavddit # Contracted test examples:*
* *boavddi:* `boavddit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3`
* *boavddij:* `boavddit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3`

LEXICON BASSUT_IV  Passives

* buvvut # Contracted test examples:*
* *buvvuv:* `buvvut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *buvvujiv:* `buvvut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *buvvujma:* `buvvut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON OADDÁT_IV    Inceptive, (doarrut,jåhttåt). Only Sg3 passive. Does not make nouns via -ár derivation.
